Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-574
Dark fiber, defined.

For purposes of sections 86-574 to 86-578, dark fiber means any unused fiber optic cable through which no light is transmitted or any installed fiber optic cable not carrying a signal.

Laws 2001, LB 827, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,2001, § 86-2301;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 344.